Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-1430
Assistant funeral director; employment; collaborative agreement; required.

Prior to acting as an assistant funeral director, the assistant funeral director shall be employed by a funeral director licensed pursuant to the Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice Act and shall be a party to a signed collaborative agreement with the licensed funeral director. An assistant funeral director may be so employed by more than one funeral director in Nebraska by being a party to a signed collaborative agreement with each licensed funeral director.

Laws 2025, LB332, § 7.